New Jersey, session 221, A3135.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 12 of P.L.1995, c.244 (C.2A:50-64) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  With respect to the sale of a mortgaged premises under foreclosure action, each sheriff in this State shall provide for, but not be limited to, the following uniform procedures: (1)  Bidding in the name of the assignee of the foreclosing plaintiff. (2)  That adjournment of the sale of the foreclosed property shall be in accordance with N.J.S.2A:17-36. (3)  (a)  The sheriff shall conduct a sale within 150 days of the sheriff's receipt of any writ of execution issued by the court in any foreclosure proceeding. (b)  If it becomes apparent that the sheriff cannot comply with the provisions of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph (3), the foreclosing plaintiff may apply to the office for an order appointing a Special Master to hold the foreclosure sale. (c)   Upon the foreclosing plaintiff making such application to the office, the office shall issue the appropriate order appointing a Special Master to hold the foreclosure sale. The office may issue the order to appoint a Special Master to hold foreclosure sales for one or more properties within a vicinage. (4)  That the upset price for the sale of the foreclosed upon property be no higher than 50 percent of the sum of the outstanding mortgage and any interest, fees, or other costs accumulated from the beginning of the foreclosure action. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph with respect to the purchase of residential property for which there is a 84 month occupancy requirement, the successful bidder at the sheriff's sale shall pay a 20 percent deposit in either cash or by a certified or cashier's check, made payable to the sheriff of the county in which the sale is conducted, immediately upon the conclusion of the foreclosure sale. In the case of residential property in which the bidder shall occupy the property as the bidders primary residence for a period of at least 84 months, the successful bidder who has fulfilled the requirements set forth in subsection g. of this section shall pay a 3.5 percent deposit by cash, certified or cashiers check, or by wire transfer, made payable to the sheriff of the county in which the sale is conducted or to the Special Master, if the sheriff cannot comply with the provisions of subparagraph (a) of paragraph (3) of this subsection, immediately upon the conclusion of the foreclosure sale. If the successful bidder cannot satisfy this requirement, the bidder shall be in default and the sheriff shall immediately void the sale and proceed further with the resale of the premises without the necessity of adjourning the sale, without renotification of any party to the foreclosure and without the republication of any sales notice.  Upon such resale, the defaulting bidder shall be liable to the foreclosing plaintiff for any additional costs incurred by such default including, but not limited to, any difference between the amount bid by the defaulting bidder and the amount generated for the foreclosing plaintiff at the resale.  In the event the plaintiff is the successful bidder at the resale, the plaintiff shall provide a credit for the fair market value of the property foreclosed. [(5)] (6)      It is permissible, upon consent of the sheriff conducting the sheriff's sale, that it shall not be necessary for an attorney or representative of the person who initiated the foreclosure to be present physically at the sheriff's sale to make a bid.  A letter containing bidding instructions may be sent to the sheriff in lieu of an appearance. [(6)] (7)    That each sheriff's office shall use, and the plaintiff's attorney shall prepare and submit to the sheriff's office, a deed which shall be in substantially the following form: THIS INDENTURE, made this ..................... (date) day of ..................... (month), ........... (year).  Between ................................ (name), Sheriff of the County of ................. (name) in the  State of New Jersey, party of the first part and .................................................... (name(s)) party of the second part, witnesseth. WHEREAS, on the ...................... (date) day of ......................... (month), ....... (year), a certain Writ of Execution was issued out of the Superior Court of New Jersey, Chancery Division- .................... (name) County, Docket No.                directed and delivered to the Sheriff of the said County of .................. (name) and which said Writ is in the words or to the effect following that is to say: THE STATE OF NEW JERSEY to the Sheriff of the County of .................. (name), Greeting: WHEREAS, on the ................. (date) day of ............. (month), ............... (year), by a certain judgment made in our Superior Court of New Jersey, in a certain cause therein pending, wherein the PLAINTIFF is: ................................................................... ................................................................... ................................................................... and the following named parties are the DEFENDANTS: ................................................................... ................................................................... ................................................................... IT WAS ORDERED AND ADJUDGED that certain mortgaged premises, with the appurtenances in the Complaint, and Amendment to Complaint, if any, in the said cause particularly set forth and described, that is to say:  The mortgaged premises are described as set forth upon the RIDER ANNEXED HERETO AND MADE A PART HEREOF. BEING KNOWN AS Tax Lot ........ (number) in Block ......... (number) COMMONLY KNOWN AS (street address) ....................... . TOGETHER, with all and singular the rights, liberties, privileges, hereditaments and appurtenances thereunto belonging or in anywise appertaining, and the reversion and remainders, rents, issues and profits thereof, and also all the estate, right, title, interest, use, property, claim and demand of the said defendants of, in, to and out of the same, to be sold, to pay and satisfy in the first place unto the plaintiff, ................................................................... ................................................................... the sum of $ ......... (amount) being the principal, interest and advances secured by a certain mortgage dated ............... (date, month, year) and given by ........................ (name) together with lawful interest from ................................................................... ................................................................... ................................................................... until the same be paid and satisfied and also the costs of the aforesaid plaintiff with interest thereon. AND for that purpose a Writ of Execution should issue, directed to the Sheriff of the County of .............. (name) commanding him to make sale as aforesaid; and that the surplus money arising from such sale, if any there be, should be brought into our said Court, as by the judgment remaining as of record in our said Superior Court of New Jersey, at Trenton, doth and more fully appear; and whereas, the costs and Attorney's fees of the said plaintiff have been duly taxed at the following sum:  $ ............. (amount) THEREFORE, you are hereby commanded that you cause to be made of the premises aforesaid, by selling so much of the same as may be needful and necessary for the purpose, the said sum of $......... (amount)  and the same you do pay to the said plaintiff together with contract and lawful interest thereon as aforesaid, and the sum aforesaid of costs with interest thereon. And that you have the surplus money, if any there be, before our said Superior Court of New Jersey, aforesaid at Trenton, within 30 days after pursuant to R.4:59-1(a), to abide the further Order of the said Court, according to judgment aforesaid, and you are to make return at the time and place aforesaid, by certificate under your hand, of the manner in which you have executed this our Writ, together with this Writ, and if no sale, this Writ shall be returnable within [12] 24 months. WITNESS, the Honorable ........... (name), Judge of the Superior Court at Trenton, aforesaid, the ........... (date) day of ............. (month), ...... (year). /s/ ........... (Clerk) Superior Court of New Jersey /s/............................. Attorney for Plaintiff As by the record of said Writ of Execution in the Office of the Superior Court of New Jersey, at Trenton, in Book ............ (number) of Executions, Page ........ (number) etc., may more fully appear. AND WHEREAS I, the said .......................... (name), as such Sheriff as aforesaid did in due form of law, before making such sale give notice of the time and place of such sale by public advertisement signed by myself, and set up in my office in the .......................... (name) Building in .................. (name) County, being the County in which said real estate is situate and also set up at the premises to be sold at least three weeks next before the time appointed for such sale. I also caused such notice to be published four times in two newspapers designated by me and printed and published in the said County, the County wherein the real estate sold is situate, the same being designated for the publication by the Laws of this State, and circulating in the neighborhood of said real estate, at least once a week during four consecutive calendar weeks.  One of such newspapers, ......................... (name of newspaper) is a newspaper with circulation in ................. (name of town), the County seat of said ................. (name) County.  The first publication was at least twenty-one days prior and the last publication not more than eight days prior to the time appointed for the sale of such real estate, and by virtue of the said Writ of Execution, I did offer for sale said land and premises at public vendue at the County ................ (name) Building in ...................... (name of town) on the ............... (date) day of ........................, .... (month) (year) at the hour of ............. (time) in the ......... (a.m. or p.m.). WHEREUPON the said party of the second part bidding therefore for the same, the sum of $................ (amount)  and no other person bidding as much I did then and there openly and publicly in due form of law between the hours of ............... (time) and ................ (time) in the ........ (a.m. or p.m.), strike off and sell tracts or parcels of land and premises for the sum of $ ................ (amount) to the said party of the second part being then and there the highest bidder for same.  And on the ............ (date) of ................. (month) in the year last aforesaid I did truly report the said sale to the Superior Court of New Jersey, Chancery Division and no objection to the said sale having been made, and by Assignment of Bid filed with the Sheriff of .................. (name) County said bidder assigned its bid to: ................................................................... ................................................................... ................................................................... NOW, THEREFORE, This Indenture witnesseth, that I, the said ..................  (name), as such Sheriff as aforesaid under and by the virtue of the said Writ of Execution and in execution of the power and trust in me reposed and also for and in consideration of the said sum of $ ............... (amount) therefrom acquit, exonerate and forever discharge to the said party of the second part, its successors and assigns, all and singular the said tract or parcel of lands and premises, with the appurtenances, privileges, and hereditaments thereunto belonging or in any way appertaining; to have and hold the same, unto the said party of the second part, its successors and assigns to its and their only proper use, benefit, and behoof forever, in as full, ample and beneficial manner as by virtue of said Writ of Execution I may, can or ought to convey the same. And, I, the said ................ (name), do hereby covenant, promise and agree, to and with the said party of the second part, its successors and assigns, that I have not, as such Sheriff as aforesaid, done or caused, suffered or procured to be done any act, matter or thing whereby the said premises, or any part thereof, with the appurtenances, are or may be charged or encumbered in estate, title or otherwise. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I the said ..................... (name) as such Sheriff as aforesaid, have hereunto set my hand and seal the day and year aforesaid. Signed, sealed and delivered in the presence of ..................................             .............................. Attorney at Law of New Jersey        ...........(name) Sheriff STATE OF NEW JERSEY)   SS. .......(county     ) I, ............... (name), Sheriff, of the County of ............... (name), do solemnly swear that the real estate described in this deed made to ................................................................... ................................................................... ................................................................... was by me sold by virtue of a good and subsisting execution (or as the case may be) as is therein recited, that the money ordered to be made has not been to my knowledge or belief paid or satisfied, that the time and place of the same of said real estate were by me duly advertised as required by law, and that the same was cried off and sold to a bona fide purchaser for the best price that could be obtained and the true consideration for this conveyance as set forth in the deed is $ ........................ (amount). .................................. ......... (name), Sheriff Sworn before me, ................. (name), on this .......... (date) day of .................. (month), ......... (year), and I having examined the deed above mentioned do approve the same and order it to be recorded as a good and sufficient conveyance of the real estate therein described. STATE OF NEW JERSEY)    ss.     ........................ .......... (Name) County)         Attorney or Notary Public On this ................... (date) day of ................. (month), ........ (year), before me, the subscriber, ........................ (name) personally appeared ...................... (name), Sheriff of the County of ................ (name) aforesaid, who is, I am satisfied, the grantor in the within Indenture named, and I having first made known to him the contents thereof, he did thereupon acknowledge that he signed, sealed and delivered the same on his voluntary act and deed, for the uses and purposes therein expressed. ............................. Attorney or Notary Public b.         At the conclusion of the sheriff's sale, the attorney for the plaintiff shall prepare and deliver to the sheriff a deed which shall be in the form provided pursuant to paragraph [(6)] (7) of subsection a. of this section for the sheriff's execution and the deed shall be delivered to the sheriff within 10 days of the date of the sale.  The sheriff shall be entitled to the authorized fee, as a review fee, even if the plaintiff's attorney prepares the deed. c.    (1)  The sheriff's office shall, within two weeks of the date of the sale, deliver a fully executed deed to the successful bidder at the sale provided that the bidder pays the balance of the monies due to the Sheriff by either cash or certified or cashier's check.  In the event a bid is satisfied after the expiration and additional interest is collected from the successful bidder, the sheriff shall remit to the plaintiff the total amount, less any fees, costs and commissions due the sheriff, along with the additional interest. (2)  In the case of residential property in which the bidder shall occupy the property as the bidders primary residence for a period of at least 84 months, no interest shall accrue on the balance of the sale of the property until 60 business days have passed following the date of the sale, and thereafter, the successful bidder shall have 30 business days to fulfill the balance.  If the successful bidder fails to fulfill the balance within this 90 business day period, the bidder shall forfeit the deposit on the property and shall be responsible for the payment of accrued interest and any fees or penalties incurred as a result of the sale being void, unless the failure to fulfill the balance is due to the bidders inability to close a mortgage through no fault of their own, such as because the appraised value of the property is less than the purchase value of the property, in which case the bidder shall be refunded the deposit on the property and shall be responsible only for the payment of accrued interest and any fees or penalties incurred as a result of the sale being void. d.    Prior to completion of a sale of residential property, the foreclosing plaintiff shall disclose whether the property is vacant, tenant-occupied, or owner-occupied. If the property is vacant, the financial institution shall provide the successful bidder access to the property. e.    A bidder, including, but not limited to, next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant, may purchase residential property at a sheriffs sale by way of financing if the bidder provides documentation that the bidder has been pre-approved by a financial institution regulated by the Department of Banking and Insurance or by a federal banking agency, as defined by section 3 of the New Jersey Residential Mortgage Lending Act, P.L.2009, c.53 (C.17:11C-53), for financing the property. (1)  A bidder who intends to finance the purchase of residential property at a sale shall be: (a)   limited to submitting bids no higher than the amount for which the bidder has been pre-approved for financing; and (b)  required to present current and valid photo identification that substantially conforms to the name and information contained on the financing pre-approval forms obtained by the bidder. (2)  With exception to the foreclosed upon defendant or the foreclosed upon defendants next of kin, a bidder purchasing residential property in a sheriffs sale pursuant to this subsection shall be required by the financial institution to occupy the property as the bidders primary residence for a fixed term, of at least 84 months after taking possession.  The deed for the property shall clearly state that the property may not be sold for 84 months from the date of the sheriffs sale. (3)  A successful bidder who finances the purchase and does not occupy the residence for a period of at least 84 months shall be assessed a fine by a court of competent jurisdiction up to $100,000 for the first violation, and $500,000 thereafter for each subsequent violation.  These penalties shall not be assessed against a bidder who finances the purchase in good faith and is thereafter required to vacate the property prior to residing in the property for 84 months due to death of the bidder or the bidders spouse, disability of the bidder or the bidders spouse, divorce, military deployment, or foreclosure.  In the event of the death of a successful bidder, the property may be transferred to another owner in accordance with applicable laws governing estate, inheritance, and probate matters. f.     In the case of a residential property that is financed pursuant to subsection e. of this section, the sheriffs office shall oversee the occupancy of the property, which may include the mailing of a questionnaire to the successful bidder within 84 months following the sale, requiring the bidder to respond to questions and submit documentation evidencing the bidders continued residence at the property.  If the agency determines based upon its oversight that there has been an occupancy violation, the agency shall bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction so that the sheriffs office can pursue enforcement of penalties for the violation. g.    In the case of residential property, to be a successful bidder who is not the plaintiff, and who intends to occupy the property, and finance the purchase of the property, the bidder shall have received eight hours of homebuyer education and counseling through a program provided by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), and shall present certification of completion of that program within 90 business days of the date that the sheriffs sale shall occur. h.    Each sheriffs office shall maintain information, written in plain language, regarding the program to finance the purchase of residential property in a foreclosure sale in accordance with this section on its Internet website in a manner that is accessible to the public.  Additionally, each sheriffs office shall display information, written in plain language, regarding the program in its office in a manner that is conspicuous to the public.  The information posted on a sheriffs Internet website or displayed in a sheriffs office concerning the program shall further contain language notifying the public that the program shall exclude those purchasing property for investment purposes.  For any county in which the primary language of 10 percent or more of the residents is a language other than English, the sheriffs office shall provide the information required by this subsection in that other language or languages in addition to English.  The alternate language shall be determined based on information from the latest federal decennial census. i.     If the foreclosed upon defendant or the next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant fails to secure financing or assets sufficient to meet the terms offered by the foreclosing plaintiff or an alternative financial institution to purchase the residential property, the foreclosed upon defendant or next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant may request that a nonprofit community development corporation purchase the property.  If the nonprofit community development corporation agrees to purchase the property from the foreclosed upon defendant or next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant, the corporation shall: (1)  allow the foreclosed upon defendant or next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant to reside at the property for a period of time as agreed upon in paragraph (2) of this subsection; and (2)  negotiate with the foreclosed upon defendant or next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant on an affordable lease schedule that shall include an option to purchase the property from the corporation. j.    A nonprofit community development corporation intending to bid in a sheriffs sale for residential property shall, prior to the sale, register its participation with the sheriff or Special Master if the sheriff cannot comply with the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section.  In registering its participation in the sale, a corporation shall provide the following information: (a)   the most recent form 1023 filing provided to the United States Internal Revenue Service, stating the corporations mission of community revitalization and the creation or preservation of affordable housing through the restoration of vacant and abandoned property; and (b)  a nonprofit determination letter from the United States Internal Revenue Service that was made at least 36 months prior to the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). k.    (1) A nonprofit community development corporation, founded at least 36 months prior to the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), that successfully bids on the purchase of a residential property in a sheriffs sale shall: (a)   restore as need be and sell the property to a household earning no more than 120 percent below area median income or rent the property as an affordable housing unit to a household who earns no more than 100 percent below area median income, if the property is vacant or abandoned at the time of the sheriffs sale; or (b)  if the property is occupied at the time of sale by the foreclosed upon defendant or a tenant, the nonprofit community development corporation shall negotiate with the foreclosed upon defendant or tenant on an affordable lease schedule that will allow the foreclosed upon defendant or tenant to continue to occupy the property should the foreclosed upon defendant or tenant desire to do so.  If after 120 business days the foreclosed upon defendant or tenant does not respond to the requests of the nonprofit community development corporation to negotiate, the corporation may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to remove the foreclosed upon defendant or tenant.  If removal has successfully occurred, the nonprofit community development corporation shall comply with the requirements of subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) of this subsection. (2)  A nonprofit community development corporation that successfully bids on the purchase of a residential property shall ensure that, in any future sale of the property pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the property be subject to a 30-year deed restriction requiring any future property owner to sell the property to a household earning no more than 120 percent below area median income or rent the property as an affordable housing unit to a household who earns no more than 100 percent below area median income. l.     Sales for real estate owned residential property, which shall include but not be limited to virtual auctions, shall be subject to the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). m.   Any penalty imposed pursuant to this section may be recovered with costs in a summary proceeding commenced by the appropriate sheriffs office pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  Fifty percent of any monies collected pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the municipality in which the foreclosed upon property is located to be deposited in the affordable housing trust fund of the municipality for use on low income housing or moderate income housing needs as defined in section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304), to the extent the municipality maintains such a fund, and if the municipality does not maintain such a fund, to the State Treasurer, and shall annually be appropriated to the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund, section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320) for the purpose of developing and supporting housing programs that create for-sale and rental affordable housing for the workforce.  The remaining 50 percent of any monies collected pursuant to this section shall provide for administrative and enforcement costs, including costs incurred by the sheriffs office, necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. n.    (1)  If the foreclosed upon defendant or the next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant has secured financing or assets sufficient to meet terms offered by the foreclosing plaintiff or an alternative financial institution to purchase the property, the foreclosed upon defendant or the next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant shall have the right of first refusal to purchase the property in the amount approved for the opening bid of the sheriffs sale at the time of the sale.  Upon conclusion of the sale, the foreclosed upon defendant or the next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant shall pay a 3.5 percent deposit in either cash, money order, certified or cashiers check, or wire transfer, made payable to the sheriff of the county in which the sale is conducted or to the Special Master, if the sheriff cannot comply with the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section. (2)  A nonprofit community development corporation shall have a right of second refusal to purchase the property which is subordinate to the first right of refusal provided to a foreclosed upon defendant and next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection l. of this section.  If the foreclosed upon defendant or next of kin of the foreclosed upon defendant decides not to participate in the sheriffs sale or fails to secure financing or assets sufficient to meet the terms offered by the foreclosing plaintiff or an alternative financial institution to purchase the property, the corporation shall have the right of second refusal to purchase the property in the amount approved for the opening bid of the sheriffs sale at the time of the sale. Upon conclusion of the sale, the corporation shall pay a 3.5 percent deposit in either cash, money order, certified or cashiers check, or wire transfer, made payable to the sheriff of the county in which the sale is conducted or to the Special Master, if the sheriff cannot comply with the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section. o.    As used in this section: Area median income means the midpoint of a regions household income distribution, as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. Nonprofit community development corporation means a not-for-profit organization, incorporated at least 36 months prior to the enactment of this bill, whose mission centers around community revitalization through the restoration of vacant and abandoned property to create or preserve affordable housing, as indicated in the corporations most recent form 1023 filing provided to the United States Internal Revenue Service. Real estate owned residential property means residential property owned by a financial institution, as defined in subsection e. of this section, or a government agency. Residential property means real property located in this State in which people reside or dwell as their primary residence, as distinguished from property which is used for investment, commercial, or business purposes. Upset price means the minimum amount that a foreclosed upon property shall be sold for in a sheriffs sale. (cf: P.L.2019, c.71, s.1) 2.    N.J.S.22A:4-8 is amended to read as follows: 22A:4-8.  For the services hereinafter enumerated sheriffs and other officers shall receive the following fees: In addition to the mileage allowed by law, for serving every summons and complaint, attachment or any mesne process issuing out of the Superior Court, the sheriff or other officer serving such process shall, for the first defendant or party on whom such process is served, be allowed $22.00  and, for service on the second defendant named therein, $20.00, and for serving such process on any other defendant or defendants named therein, $16.00 each, and no more. If a man and his wife be named in such process they shall be considered as one defendant, except where they are living separate and apart. Serving summons and complaint in matrimonial actions, in addition to mileage, $22.00. Serving capias ad respondendum, capias ad satisfaciendum, warrant of commitment, writ of ne exeat, in addition to mileage, $48.00. Serving order to summon juries and return, $8.00. Serving every execution against goods or lands and making an inventory and return, in addition to mileage, $48.00. For returning every writ, $2.00. Executing every writ of possession and return, in addition to mileage, $48.00. Executing every writ of attachment, sequestration or replevin issuing out of any of the courts, in addition to mileage, $48.00. For serving each out-of-State paper, in addition to the mileage allowed by law, $25.00 for the first defendant on whom such paper is served, $20.00 for service on the second defendant named therein, and $16.00 for serving such paper on any other defendant or defendants named therein. If a man and wife be named in such paper, they shall be considered as one defendant, except where they are living separate and apart. For serving or executing any process or papers where mileage is allowed by law, the officer shall receive mileage actually traveled to and from the courthouse, at the rate per mile of $0.16. The sheriff shall be entitled to retain out of all moneys collected or received by him on a forfeited recognizance, whether before or after execution, or from amercements, or from fines and costs on conviction, on indictment or otherwise, whether such moneys are payable to the State or to the county treasurer of the county wherein conviction was had, [5%] five percent. For transporting each offender to the State Prison, per mile, but not less than $3.00 for each offender, to be certified by the keeper of the prison and the certificate to be delivered to the county treasurer of the county where the conviction was had, $0.23. EXECUTION SALES [When] Except as to sales conducted in accordance with section 12 of P.L.1995, c.244 (C.2A:50-64), when a sale is made by virtue of an execution the sheriff shall be entitled to charge the following fees: On all sums not exceeding $5,000.00, [6%] 10 percent; on all sums exceeding $5,000.00 on such excess, [4%] five percent; the minimum fee to be charged for a sale by virtue of an execution, [$50.00] $150.00. When sales are conducted in accordance with section 12 of P.L.1995, c.244 (C.2A:50-64),  the sheriff shall be entitled to charge six percent on a sale by virtue of an execution. On an execution against wages, commissions and salaries, the sheriff shall charge the same percentage fees on all sums collected as those percentage fees applicable in cases wherein an execution sale is consummated. When the execution is settled without actual sale and such settlement is made manifest to the officer, the officer shall receive [1/2] one-half of the amount of percentage allowed herein in case of sale. Making statement of execution, sales and execution fees, $10.00. Advertising the property for sale, provided the sheriff or deputy sheriff attend in pursuance of the advertisement, $20.00. Posting property for sale, $20.00. For the crier of the vendue, when the sheriff proceeds to sell, for every day he shall be actually employed in such sale, $5.00. Every adjournment of a sale, but no more than one adjournment shall be allowed, and if the sheriff shall have several executions against a defendant, he shall only be allowed for advertising, attending and adjourning, as if he had but one execution, $28.00. Drawing and making a deed to a purchaser of real property, $75.00. Drawing and making a bill of sale to the purchaser of personal property when such bill of sale is required or demanded, $20.00. When more than one execution shall be issued out of the Superior Court upon any judgment, each sheriff to whom such execution shall be directed and delivered shall be entitled to collect and receive from the defendant named in such execution the fees allowed by law for making a levy and return and statement thereon, or for such other services as may be actually performed by him, and the sheriff who shall collect the amount named in said execution or any part thereof, shall be entitled to the legal percentage upon whatever amount may be so collected by him, but in case any such judgment shall be settled between the parties and the amount due thereon shall not be collected by either sheriff, then the percentage on the amount collected which would be due the sheriff thereon in case only one execution had been issued shall be equally divided among the several sheriffs in whose hands an execution in the same cause may have been placed. The sheriff shall file his taxed bill of costs with the clerk of the court out of which execution issued, within such time as the court shall direct by general rule or special order, or, in default thereof, he shall not be entitled to any costs. If any sheriff shall charge in such bill of costs for services not done, or allowed by law, or shall take any greater fee or reward for any services by him done than is or shall be allowed by law, he shall be liable for the damages sustained by the party aggrieved including a penalty of $30.00, to be recovered in a summary manner, in the action or proceeding wherein the execution was issued or otherwise. (cf: P.L.2001, c.370, s.5) 3.   (New section)  a.  In situations in which a creditor has instituted a foreclosure proceeding pursuant to the Fair Foreclosure Act, P.L.1995, c.244 (C.2A:50-53 et seq.) and a creditor employs an agent to be responsible for the care, maintenance, security, and upkeep of the property if it becomes vacant and abandoned, the creditor and agent who peacefully enters the property and exercises reasonable care in doing so, shall be immune from liability, before and after the bid, for any damage to the property or any person entering the property. b.   Persons bidding on the property shall not enter the property prior to the time of sale of the property to the successful bidder. 4.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment. STATEMENT Under the bill, in the case of residential property in which the bidder will occupy the property for at least 84 months, the bidder will have up to 90 business days to complete the sale, with no interest accruing on the balance of the sale for 60 business days following the sale.  If the successful bidder does not pay the balance within this 90 business day period, the bidder would forfeit the deposit on the property and be responsible for the payment of accrued interest and fees or penalties incurred as a result of the sale being void, unless the failure to fulfill the balance is due to the bidders inability to close a mortgage through no fault of the bidders own. The bill provides that the sheriff require the foreclosing plaintiff to disclose whether the property is vacant, tenant-occupied, or owner-occupied. Under the bill, a bidder may purchase property in a sheriffs sale by way of financing if the bidder provides documentation that the bidder has been pre-approved by a financial institution for financing the property. A bidder, other than the foreclosed upon defendant or the foreclosed upon defendants next of kin, may only use the financing option if the property will be the bidders primary residence.  If a successful bidder finances the property and does not use the property as a primary residence, the bidder will be subject to a fine of up to $100,000 for the first violation and $500,000 for each violation thereafter.  However, there are exceptions to the penalties if the bidder must vacate the property due to death of the bidder or the bidders spouse, disability of the bidder or the bidders spouse, divorce, military deployment, or foreclosure. To be a successful bidder on a residential property the bidder, who is not the plaintiff, who intends to occupy the property and finance the purchase of the property, shall have received eight hours of homebuyer education and counseling from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), and shall present certification of completion of that training at the time of purchase. The bill requires each sheriffs office to maintain information, written in plain language, regarding the program to finance the purchase of residential property in a foreclosure sale on its internet website in a manner that is accessible to the public.  Additionally, each sheriffs office is to display information, written in plain language, regarding the program in its office in a manner that is conspicuous to the public.  The information posted on a sheriffs website or displayed in a sheriffs office concerning the program must contain language notifying the public that the program excludes those purchasing property for investment purposes. For any county in which the primary language of 10 percent or more of the residents is a language other than English, the bill directs the sheriffs office to provide the information required for the program in that other language or languages in addition to English.  The alternate language would be determined based on information from the latest federal decennial census. With the exception of sales conducted pursuant to the Community Wealth Preservation Program, the bill increases the fee to be charged by virtue of an execution sale from 4 to 5 percent, or 6 percent to 10 percent, depending on whether the sum involved is greater than or less than $5,000, respectively.  The bill also increases the minimum fee to be charged by virtue of an execution sale from $50 to $150. Finally, the bill provides creditors and creditors agents with immunity from liability for damages to certain vacant and abandoned property so long as reasonable care is exercised, and clarifies that bidders are not authorized to enter the property prior to the time of sale.